Utah statutes.
53A-8-107.   Necessary staff reduction not precluded.
Nothing in this chapter prevents staff reduction if necessary to reduce the
number of employees because of the following:
(1)  declining student enrollments in the district;
(2)  the discontinuance or substantial reduction of a particular service or
program;
(3)  the shortage of anticipated revenue after the budget has been adopted; or
(4)  school consolidation.
